Hawaii, session 2026, SB219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 200-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d) Notwithstanding any limitations on commercial permits for Maui county small boat facilities, vessels engaging in inter-island ferry service within Maui county shall be afforded preferential consideration for ferry landings, including the issuance of a commercial operating permit and the waiver of any applicable fees, at Maui county small boat facilities; provided that: (1)  The vessel operator has been issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the purpose of engaging in inter-island ferry service that includes a route within Maui county; (2)  The design and performance characteristics of the vessel will permit safe navigation within the harbor entrance channel and safe docking within Maui county small boat facilities; (3)  The vessel operations will not result in unreasonable interference with the use of Maui county small boat facilities by other vessels; [and] (4)  No harbor use fees, including: (A)  Mooring fees; (B)  Passenger fees; and (C)  Commercial fees assessed under section 200‑10(c)(5) that relate to harbor use, shall be waived pursuant to this subsection; and [(4)] (5)  All preferential consideration and waivers, including any commercial permits issued under this section, shall cease upon the vessel operator's termination of inter-island ferry service within Maui county." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________